Georgia, session 2025_26, HB531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
PART I
SECTION 1-1.
This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Municipal Sovereign Immunity Act."
SECTION 1-2.
Chapter 33 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to liability of
municipal corporations for acts or omissions, is amended by revising subsection (b) of Code
Section 36-33-5, relating to written demand prerequisite to action for injury to person or
property, time for presenting claim and for consideration by governing authority, suspension
of limitations, statement of specific amount of monetary damages sought, and service of
claim on city officials, as follows:
"(b) Within six 12 months of the happening of the event upon which a claim against a
municipal corporation is predicated, the person, firm, or corporation having the claim shall
present the claim in writing to the governing authority of the municipal corporation for
adjustment, stating the time, place, and extent of the injury, as nearly as practicable, and
the negligence which caused the injury. No action shall be entertained by the courts
against the municipal corporation until the cause of action therein has first been presented
to the governing authority for adjustment."
SECTION 1-3.
Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"36-33-7.
(a) It is the specific intent of the General Assembly that municipal tort claims shall be
subject to the limitations provided in this Code section. In any civil action or claim for
- 2 -

LC 49 2388S
damages brought under the provisions of this chapter, no claimant shall recover a sum
exceeding $3 million from any single municipality because of loss arising from a single
occurrence; and any single municipality's aggregate liability per occurrence shall not
exceed $5 million. The existence of these caps on liability shall not be disclosed or
suggested to the jury during the trial of any action brought under this chapter.
(b) No award for damages under this chapter shall include punitive or exemplary damages.
(c) Trial of tort claims against the municipality under this chapter shall be conducted by
a judge with a jury; provided, however, that the parties may agree that the same be tried by
a judge without a jury.
(d) This Code section shall not be construed as a new waiver of immunity as required by
Article IX, Section II, Paragraph IX of the Constitution of the State of Georgia. Any such
new waiver must be pled and proven by the claimant as provided by law."
SECTION 1-3A.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 36-33-1, relating to immunity from
liability for damages, waiver of immunity by purchase of liability insurance, and liability for
acts or omissions generally, as follows:
"36-33-1.
(a) Pursuant to Article IX, Section II, Paragraph IX of the Constitution of the State of
Georgia, the General Assembly, except as provided in this Code section and in Chapter 92
of this title, declares it is the public policy of the State of Georgia that there is no waiver
of the sovereign immunity of municipal corporations of the state and such municipal
corporations shall be immune from liability for damages. A municipal corporation shall
not waive its immunity by the purchase of liability insurance, except as provided in Code
Section 33-24-51 or 36-92-2, or unless the policy of insurance issued covers an occurrence
for which the defense of sovereign immunity is available, and then only to the extent of the
limits of such insurance policy. This subsection shall not be construed to affect any
- 3 -

LC 49 2388S
litigation pending on July 1, 1986. In addition to the waivers of a municipal corporation's
immunity as provided by Code Sections 33-24-51 and 36-92-2, a municipal corporation
shall waive its immunity by the purchase of liability insurance if the policy of insurance
covers an occurrence and then only to the extent of the limits of the insurance policy. It
shall be against public policy, void, and unenforceable for a contract for liability insurance
to attempt to avoid the effect of this waiver of immunity, or any other waiver of a
municipal corporation's immunity. Among other things, the duty to pay damages on behalf
of a municipality must be determined under the policy of insurance without consideration
of whether immunity would otherwise exist for those damages.
(b) Municipal corporations shall not be liable for failure to perform or for errors in
performing their legislative or judicial powers. For neglect to perform or improper or
unskillful performance of their ministerial duties, they shall be liable."
PART II
SECTION 2-1.
Chapter 80 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions applicable to counties, municipal corporations, and other governmental entities,
is amended by adding a new subsection to Code Section 36-80-23, relating to prohibition on
immigration sanctuary policies by local governmental entities, and certification of
compliance, to read as follows:
"(f) In the event that a local governing body acts in violation of this Code section, the
sovereign immunity of such local governing body and the governmental immunity of all
local officials and employees of such local governing body is waived in all matters arising
from or resulting in the violation of this Code section."
- 4 -

LC 49 2388S
SECTION 2-2.
Code Section 42-1-11.5 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to compliance
with immigration detainer notices, is amended by revising said Code section as follows:
"42-1-11.5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Custodial authority' means the commissioner if a person is in physical custody at a
penal institution, the sheriff if a person is in physical custody at a county jail, the warden
if a person is in physical custody at a county correctional institution, and the chief of
police if a person is in physical custody at a municipal detention facility.
(2) 'Immigration detainer notice' means documentation issued by the federal government
100 requesting that a custodial authority maintain temporary custody of an illegal alien as
101 such term is defined in Code Section 42-4-14, including a United States Department of
102 Homeland Security Form I-247 document or a similar successor form.
103 (b) Any custodial authority who has custody of a person who is subject to an immigration
104 detainer notice shall:
105 (1) Comply with, honor, and fulfill any request made in the immigration detainer notice;
106 and
107 (2) Inform the person identified in the immigration detainer notice that the person is
108 being held pursuant to such notice.
109 (c) In the event that a custodial authority acts in violation of this Code section, the
110 sovereign and other governmental immunities of such custodial authority are waived in all
111 matters arising from or resulting in the violation of this Code section."
- 5 -

LC 49 2388S
112 PART III
113 SECTION 3-1.
114 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
115 without such approval.
116 SECTION 3-2.
117 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 6 -